es: Variedad de fruta: Manzana; Albaricoque; Banana; Arándano; Cereza; Arándano rojo; Dátil; Mango; Cáscara de naranja; Fresa; Otro
sv: Fruktsort: Äpple; Aprikos; Banan; Blåbär; Körsbär; Tranbär; Dadel; Mango; Apelsinskal; Jordgubbe; Övrigt
sk-SK: Odroda ovocia: Jablko; Marhuľa; Banán; Čučoriedka; Čerešňa; Brusnica; Datľa; Mango; Pomarančová kôra; Jahoda; Iné
de: Fruchtsorte: Apfel; Aprikose; Banane; Blaubeere; Kirsche; Cranberry; Dattel; Mango; Orangenschale; Erdbeere; Sonstige
fi: Hedelmälajike: Omena; Aprikoosi; Banaani; Mustikka; Kirsikka; Karpalo; Taateli; Mango; Appelsiininkuori; Mansikka; Muu
tr: Meyve çeşidi: Elma; Kayısı; Muz; Yaban mersini; Kiraz; Turna yemişi; Hurma; Mango; Portakal kabuğu; Çilek; Diğer
zh-TW: 水果品種: 蘋果; 杏桃; 香蕉; 藍莓; 櫻桃; 蔓越莓; 椰棗; 芒果; 橙皮; 草莓; 其他
hu: Gyümölcs fajtája: Alma; Sárgabarack; Banán; Áfonya; Cseresznye; Tőzegáfonya; Datolya; Mangó; Narancshéj; Eper; Egyéb
it: Varietà di frutta: Mela; Albicocca; Banana; Mirtillo; Ciliegia; Mirtillo rosso; Dattero; Mango; Scorza d’arancia; Fragola; Altro
fr: Variété de fruits: Pomme; Abricot; Banane; Myrtille; Cerise; Canneberge; Datte; Mangue; Écorce d’orange; Fraise; Autre
lt-LT: Vaisių rūšis: Obuolys; Abrikosas; Bananas; Šilauogė; Vyšnia; Spanguolė; Datulė; Mangas; Apelsino žievelė; Braškė; Kita
ko: 과일 품종: 사과; 살구; 바나나; 블루베리; 체리; 크랜베리; 대추야자; 망고; 오렌지 껍질; 딸기; 기타
en: Fruit variety: Apple; Apricot; Banana; Blueberry; Cherry; Cranberry; Date; Mango; Orange peel; Strawberry; Other
nl: Fruitsoort: Appel; Abrikoos; Banaan; Bosbes; Kers; Cranberry; Dadel; Mango; Sinaasappelschil; Aardbei; Anders
el: Ποικιλία φρούτων: Μήλο; Βερίκοκο; Μπανάνα; Μύρτιλο; Κεράσι; Κράνμπερι; Χουρμάς; Μάνγκο; Φλούδα πορτοκαλιού; Φράουλα; Άλλο
nb: Fruktvariant: Eple; Aprikos; Banan; Blåbær; Kirsebær; Tranebær; Daddel; Mango; Appelsinskall; Jordbær; Annet
cs: Odrůda ovoce: Jablko; Meruňka; Banán; Borůvka; Třešeň; Brusinka; Datle; Mango; Pomerančová kůra; Jahoda; Ostatní
vi: Chủng loại trái cây: Táo; Mơ; Chuối; Việt quất; Anh đào; Nam việt quất; Chà là; Xoài; Vỏ cam; Dâu tây; Khác
bg-BG: Разновидност плодове: Ябълка; Кайсия; Банан; Боровинка; Череша; Червена боровинка; Фурма; Манго; Портокалова кора; Ягода; Друго
pl: Odmiana owocu: Jabłko; Morela; Banan; Borówka; Wiśnia; Żurawina; Daktyl; Mango; Skórka pomarańczowa; Truskawka; Inne
sl-SI: Sorta sadja: Jabolko; Marelica; Banana; Borovnica; Češnja; Brusnica; Datelj; Mango; Pomarančna lupina; Jagoda; Drugo
da: Frugtvariant: Æble; Abrikos; Banan; Blåbær; Kirsebær; Tranebær; Daddel; Mango; Appelsinskal; Jordbær; Andet
ru: Сорт фруктов: Яблоко; Абрикос; Банан; Голубика; Вишня; Клюква; Финик; Манго; Апельсиновая цедра; Клубника; Другое
th: พันธุ์ผลไม้: แอปเปิล; แอปริคอต; กล้วย; บลูเบอร์รี; เชอร์รี; แครนเบอร์รี; อินทผลัม; มะม่วง; เปลือกส้ม; สตรอว์เบอร์รี; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 水果品种: 苹果; 杏; 香蕉; 蓝莓; 樱桃; 蔓越莓; 枣; 芒果; 橙皮; 草莓; 其他
pt-PT: Variedade de fruta: Maçã; Alperce; Banana; Mirtilo; Cereja; Arando; Tâmara; Manga; Casca de laranja; Morango; Outro
hr-HR: Sorta voća: Jabuka; Marelica; Banana; Borovnica; Trešnja; Brusnica; Datulja; Mango; Kora naranče; Jagoda; Ostalo
pt-BR: Variedade de fruta: Maçã; Damasco; Banana; Mirtilo; Cereja; Cranberry; Tâmara; Manga; Casca de laranja; Morango; Outra
ja: フルーツの種類: リンゴ; アプリコット; バナナ; ブルーベリー; チェリー; クランベリー; デーツ; マンゴー; オレンジピール; イチゴ; その他
ro-RO: Soiul de fructe: Măr; Caisă; Banană; Afină; Cireașă; Merișor; Curmală; Mango; Cojă de portocală; Căpșună; Altele